Arkansas, session 2025, HB1752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-66-220 is amended to read as follows:
16-66-220. Pension, and profit-sharing, retirement, and savings plans —
Definition.
(a)(1) A person's right to the assets held in or to receive payments,
whether vested or not, under a pension, profit-sharing, or similar plan or
contract, including a retirement plan for self-employed individuals, or under
an individual retirement account or an individual retirement annuity,
including a simplified employee pension plan, is exempt from attachment,
execution, and seizure for the satisfaction of debts unless the plan,
contract, or account does not qualify under the applicable provisions of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
(2) A person's right to the assets held in or to receive
payments, whether vested or not, under a government or church plan or
contract is also exempt unless the plan or contract does not qualify under
the definition of a government or church plan under the applicable provisions
of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
(b)(1) Contributions to an individual retirement account that exceed
the amounts deductible under the applicable provisions of the Internal
*CEB086*
03/11/2025 12:01:08 PM CEB086

HB1752
Revenue Code of 1986 and any accrued earnings on such contributions are not
exempt under this section unless otherwise exempt by law.
(2) However, the limitations of subdivision (b)(1) of this
section do not apply to an individual retirement account established pursuant
to and qualifying under § 408(A) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
(c)(1) A person's vested or unvested right to the assets held in or to
receive payments under a qualified savings plan is exempt from attachment,
execution, and seizure for the satisfaction of debts.
(2)(a) As used in subdivision (c)(1), "qualified savings plan"
means any stock, bonus, pension, annuity, deferred compensation, profit-
sharing, health, education, or similar plan or account not included in
subsection (a) of this section, to the extent that the plan or account is
exempt from federal income tax or to the extent federal income tax on a
person's interest in the plan or account is deferred until actual payment of
the benefits to the person.
(b) "Qualified savings plan" includes without limitation:
(i) A plan or account that is subject to federal
income tax solely under 26 U.S.C. §§ 511 — 514 as they existed on January 1,
2025;
(ii) An inherited individual retirement account or
annuity;
(iii) A health savings account;
(iv) A qualified tuition program of any state that
meets the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 529, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(v) A qualified program of any state that meets the
requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 529A, as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(vi) A Coverdell education savings account under 26
U.S.C. § 530, as it existed on January 1, 2025.








03/11/2025 12:01:08 PM CEB086